Utah statutes.
76-6-410.   Theft by person having custody of property pursuant to repair or rental agreement.

A person is guilty of theft if:

(1)  Having custody of property pursuant to an agreement between himself or another and the owner thereof whereby the actor or another is to perform for compensation a specific service for the owner involving the maintenance, repair, or use of such property, he intentionally uses or operates it, without the consent of the owner, for his own purposes in a manner constituting a gross deviation from the agreed purpose; or

(2)  Having custody of any property pursuant to a rental or lease agreement where it is to be returned in a specified manner or at a specified time, intentionally fails to comply with the terms of the agreement concerning return so as to render such failure a gross deviation from the agreement.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

